Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-7-611, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-7-611. A. For purposes of this section, "electronic
communication" means any transfer of signs, signals, writings,
images, sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in
whole or part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photo-electronic,
or photo-optical system, and includes, but is not limited to, the
transfer of that communication through the Internet.
B. 1. The Office of Juvenile Affairs shall certify all secure
facilities, including secure facilities collocated with adult
facilities or juvenile detention facilities. Such collocated
Req. No. 15330 Page 1

faci lities shall meet applicable criteria of the federal Juvenile
Justice Delinquency Prevention Act for collocation. To be
certified, a secure facility shall be required to meet standards for
certification promulgated by the Board of Juvenile Affairs.
2. Any person, including a resident of the facility, who
knowingly, willfully and without authority brings into or has in his
or her possession in any certified secure facility or certified
juvenile detention facility any gun, knife, bomb or other dangerous
instrument, any controlled dangerous substance as defined by Section
2-101 et seq. of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, any intoxicating
beverage or low-point beer as defined by Sections 163.1 and 163.2 of
Title 37 of the Oklahoma Statutes, any cellular phone or electronic
device capable of sending or receiving any electronic communication,
money, or financial documents for a person other than the juvenile
or youthful offender or relative of the juvenile or youthful
offender, shall be guilty of a felony and is subject to imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than
one (1) year or more than five (5) years, or a fine of not less than
One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or more than One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment staff member who
knowingly and without authority brings into or has in his or her
possession in any secure area of the Central Oklahoma Juvenile
Center any of the following items shall be guilty of a felony:

Req. No. 15330 Page 2

a. Any gun, knife, bomb, or other dangerous weapon or
instrument;
b. Any controlled dangerous substance as defined by the
Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act;
c. Any alcoholic beverage as defined by Section 1-103 of
Title 37A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
d. Any tobacco products, nicotine products, or vapor
products;
e. Money or financial documents for a juvenile other than
as authorized by Office of Juvenile Affairs policy;
f. Any item designated as contraband by the Oklahoma
Administrative Code, Title 377, or by written policies
of the Office of Juvenile Affairs; or
g. Any item that poses a threat to the security, safety,
or orderly operation of the facility as determined by
the facility administrator or the Executive Director
of the Office of Juvenile Affairs.
C. Any person, including a resident of the facility, who
knowingly, willfully and without authority brings into or has in his
or her possession in any certified secure facility or certified
juvenile detention facility any cigarettes, cigars, snuff, chewing
tobacco, or any other form of tobacco product shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in
the county jail not to exceed one (1) year, or by a fine not
Req. No. 15330 Page 3

exce eding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by both such fine and
imprisonment Upon conviction of a violation of subsection B of this
section, a staff member shall be punished by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than
one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not less
than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand
Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15330 CMA 12/29/25














Req. No. 15330 Page 4